Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,107
Licensed barber; licensed cosmetologist; waiver of course requirements; conditions.

(1) Barbers licensed in the State of Nebraska attending a school of cosmetology may be given credit of one thousand hours of training applied toward the course hours required for graduation.

(2) Cosmetologists licensed in the State of Nebraska attending a barber school or college may be given credit of one thousand hours of training applied toward the course hours required for graduation.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 105;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,144;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 369;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 33.

Barbering license under the Barber Act, see section 71-224.